South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S398.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 22-1-10(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B)(1) No person is eligible to hold the office of magistrate who is not at the time of his appointment a citizen of the United States and of this State, and who has not been a resident of this State for at least five years, has not attained the age of twenty-one years upon his appointment, and has not received a high school diploma or its equivalent educational training as recognized by the State Department of Education. (2) Notwithstanding the educational qualifications required in item (1): (a) On and after July 1, 2001, no person is eligible for an initial appointment to hold the office of magistrate who (i) is not at the time of his appointment a citizen of the United States and of this State, (ii) has not been a resident of this State for at least five years, (iii) has not attained the age of twenty-one years upon his appointment, and (iv) has not received a two-year associate degree. (b) On and after July 1, 2005, no person is eligible for an initial appointment to hold the office of magistrate who (i) is not at the time of his appointment a citizen of the United States and of this State, (ii) has not been a resident of this State for at least five years, (iii) has not attained the age of twenty-one years upon his appointment, and (iv) has not received a four-year baccalaureate degree. (c) On and after July 1, 2025, in counties with a population of less than fifty thousand people, the requirement to hold a four-year baccalaureate degree to be eligible for an initial appointment to hold the office of magistrate is waived for an individual with four years of full-time law enforcement or military experience. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----